Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5836.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-22 of the General Laws entitled "Curriculum [See Title 16
Chapter 97 — the Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended by adding thereto the
following section:
16-22-39. Ethnic studies course.
(a) Beginning with the 2026-27 school year, every high school shall be required to offer a
yearlong “ethnic studies” course studying American history and the experiences of racialized
communities in Rhode Island and the United States. This course’s coverage shall specifically
include:
(1) Native American and Indigenous history, Black and African American history, Asian
American and Pacific Islander history, the Armenian Genocide, Arab American history, and Latin
American history;
(2) Fostering critical thinking skills, and a deeper analysis of structures of power and race;
and
(3) Improved educational outcomes.
(b) The ethnic studies course shall be a social studies ‘core credit’ and a high school
graduation requirement starting with graduating classes of 2030.
(c) The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall make available to all
school districts instructional materials that may be used as guidelines for development of a unit of
instruction under this section.

(d) Each ethnic studies course shall require a student-led project; provided, however, that
each such project shall be consistent with the history and social studies standards and frameworks
promulgated by the Rhode Island board of education. Civics projects may be individual, small
group or class wide, and designed to promote a student's ability to: reason, make logical arguments
and support claims using valid evidence.
(e) Each school district shall be encouraged to work with grassroots organizations and local
institutions in developing community-based ethnic studies teacher training and curriculum.
(f) The department of elementary and secondary education (the “department”) shall
coordinate with school districts to build and expand diverse educator pipelines to support with the
delivery of ethnic studies
(g)(1) Curriculum development. Beginning with the 2025-26 school year, there shall be a
student-led ethnic studies leadership council to oversee the implementation of the requirements of
this section and supporting the development and instruction of curriculum, along with methods for
course evaluation.
(2) The council shall be comprised of one student representative and teacher liaison from
each school district selected by the district superintendent and a representative from five (5)
different community organizations that identify as being “youth-led” per the department. The
department shall be responsible for convening the leadership council with the first meeting to take
place by October 2025.
(3) After implementation, the leadership council shall continue as a permanent body to
evaluate and update ethnic studies.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
========
LC002004
========
LC002004 - Page 2 of 3